Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-810
Rates; power to fix.

Rates or charges for service may be fixed or changed by resolution duly adopted by the board of public works.

Laws 1935, c. 33, § 8, p. 140;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-708;

R.S.1943, § 17-810.